Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 13
SEVERABILITY

44-10-1301. Severability.

If any provision of this article 10 is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional, the remaining provisions of this article 10 are valid, unless it appears to the court that the valid provisions of the statute are so essentially and inseparably connected with, and so dependent upon, the void provision that it cannot be presumed that the legislature would have enacted the valid provisions without the void one; or unless the court determines that the valid provisions, standing alone, are incomplete and are incapable of being executed in accordance with the legislative intent.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2934, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-12-1101 as it existed prior to 2020.